District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0809.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Health Benefit Exchange Authority Technical Amendment Act of
2026”.
Sec. 2. The Health Benefit Exchange Authority Establishment Act of 2011, effective
March 2, 2012 (D.C. Law 19-94; D.C. Official Code § 31-3171.01 et seq.), is amended as
follows:
(a) Section 2(13) (D.C. Official Code § 31-3171.01(13)) is amended to read as follows:
“(13) “Qualified individual” means an individual, including a minor, who meets
the criteria as defined in section 1312(f)(1) of the Federal Act (42 U.S.C. § 18032).”.
(b) Section 3(b) (D.C. Official Code § 31-3171.02(b)) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (6) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a
semicolon in its place.

(2) Paragraph (7) is amended by striking the period and inserting the phrase “;
and” in its place.
(3) A new paragraph (8) is added to read as follows:
“(8) Effectuate this act, the Federal Act as it applies in the District, and applicable
District law.”.
(c) Section 5(a) (D.C. Official Code § 31-3171.04(a)) is amended as follows:
(1) A new paragraph (1B) is added to read as follow:
“(1B) Establish and operate additional programs to effectuate section 3;”.
(2) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the phrase “, with effective dates on
January 1, 2024;” and inserting a semicolon in its place.
(3) Paragraph (6) is amended by striking the word “publically” and inserting the
word “publicly” in its place.
(4) Paragraph (7) is amended by striking the phrase “guidelines developed by the
Secretary under section 1311(c)” and inserting the phrase “section 1311(c) in its place.
(5) Paragraph (10) is amended by striking the word “publically” and inserting the
word “publicly” in its place.
(6) Paragraph (16)(A) is amended to read as follows:
“(A) The name and taxpayer identification number of each individual who
is issued a certification under paragraph (15) of this subsection;”.
(7) A new paragraph (19A) is added to read as follows:
“(19A) Issue grants to effectuate the purposes outlined in section 3;”.
(8) Paragraph (22)(D)(iv) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting
a semicolon in its place.

(9) Paragraph (23) is amended by striking the period and inserting the phrase “;
and” in its place.
(10) A new paragraph (24) is added to read as follows:
“(24) Perform other functions to effectuate the purposes outlined in section 3 in
its place.”.
(d) Section 6 (D.C. Official Code § 31-3171.05) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (c) is amended as follows:
(A) The lead-in language of paragraph (1) is amended as follows:
(i) Strike the word “Each” and insert the phrase “Except as
provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection, each” in its place.
(ii) Strike the phrase “and acknowledged expertise” and insert the
word “expertise” in its place.
(B) A new paragraph (4) is added to read as follows:
“(4) One voting member of the executive board shall have demonstrated expertise
in information technology, including artificial intelligence, cybersecurity, and system
architecture, and shall not be subject to the other qualification requirements identified in
paragraph (1) of this subsection.”.
(2) Subsection (e) is amended by striking the phrase “annual basis” and inserting
the phrase “annual basis or in accordance with the executive board’s bylaws” in its place.
(e) Section 7 (D.C. Official Code § 31-3171.06) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the phrase “the functions authorized by
the Federal Act and” and inserting the phrase “the functions authorized by the Federal Act, this
act, and applicable District law and” in its place.

(2) Subsection (b) is amended by striking the phrase “Act and” and inserting the
phrase “Act, this act, and applicable District law and” in its place.
(3) Subsection (d) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (1) is amended as follows:
(i) The lead-in language is amended by striking the phrase
“understanding with eligible entities, including the” and inserting the phrase “understanding or
agreement with eligible entities, including the” in its place.
(ii) A new subparagraph (C-1) is added to read as follows:
“(C-1) Any federal or state governmental bodies, including District
government agencies;”.
(iii) Subparagraph (E) is amended by striking the phrase “plans or
in facilitating enrollment in those plans” and inserting the phrase “plans, in facilitating
enrollment in those plans, or in other activities authorized under this act or applicable District
law” in its place.
(B) Paragraph (2) is amended to read as follows:
“(2) The executive board shall ensure that any entity under a contract with the
Authority complies with the provisions of this act and the provisions imposed by the Federal Act,
when performing services on behalf of the Authority.”.
(f) Section 9 (D.C. Official Code § 31-3171.08) is amended as follows:
100 (1) Subsection (b) is amended to read as follows:
101 “(b) The executive board shall determine the appropriate compensation for the executive
102 director.”.
103 (2) Subsection (d)(3) is repealed.

104 (g) Section 10 (D.C. Official Code § 31-3171.09) is amended as follows:
105 (1) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
106 (A) Paragraph (5)(H) is amended by striking the phrase “, as defined in
107 section 4(ii) of Chapter 1 of the Affordable Exchanges Guidance, dated March 1, 2013, by” and
108 inserting the phrase “as defined by” in its place.
109 (B) The lead-in language of paragraph (6) is amended by striking the
110 phrase “and rules promulgated pursuant to this chapter or the Federal Act,” and inserting a
111 comma in its place.
112 (C) Paragraph (10) is amended by striking the phrase “defined in federal
113 regulations promulgated pursuant to section 1302(a) of the Federal Act, as defined by the District
114 without” and inserting the phrase “described in section 1302(a) of the Federal Act, and as
115 defined by the District, without” in its place.
116 (2) Subsection (c) is amended by striking the word “publically” both times it
117 appears and inserting the word “publicly” in its place.
118 (3) Subsection (e)(3) is amended by striking the phrase “prescribed by the
119 Secretary pursuant to section 1302(b)(1)(J) of the Federal Act, and such other dental benefits as
120 the Authority or the Secretary may specify by regulation” and inserting the phrase “described in
121 section 1302(b)(1)(J) of the Federal Act, and such other dental benefits as the Authority or
122 Secretary may specify” in its place.
123 (4) Subsection (h) is amended by striking the phrase “as defined in federal
124 regulations promulgated pursuant to” and inserting the phrase “as defined in” in its place.
125 (h) Section 11 (D.C. Official Code § 31-3171.10) is amended as follows:
126 (1) Subsection (a) is redesignated as subsection (b) and amended as follows:

127 (A) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase “affiliated with, or
128 otherwise a representative of, a health carrier or other insurer” and inserting the phrase
129 “financially affiliated with, or otherwise a representative of, a health carrier or other insurer,
130 third-party administrator” in its place.
131 (B) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “be a member” and inserting the phrase “be
132 a senior leadership member” in its place.
133 (3) The existing subsections (c) is repealed.
134 Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
135 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Chief Financial Officer as the fiscal
136 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
137 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
138 Sec. 4. Effective date.
139 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
140 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and a 30-day period of congressional review
141 as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
142 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).